test/src/morphology/N-kiish_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kīš: # Noun 143 'eng /est kiisk/fin' - full paradigm
     kīš+N+Sg+Nom: kīš
     kīš+N+Sg+Gen: kīš
     kīš+N+Sg+Par: kīšõ
     kīš+N+Sg+Dat: kīšõn
     kīš+N+Sg+Ins: kīšõks
     kīš+N+Sg+Ill: kīšõ
     kīš+N+Sg+Ela: kīšõst
     kīš+N+Pl+Nom: kīšõd
     kīš+N+Pl+Gen: kīšõd
     kīš+N+Pl+Par: kīšidi
     kīš+N+Pl+Dat: kīšõdõn
     kīš+N+Pl+Ins: kīšõdõks
     kīš+N+Pl+Ill: kīšiz
     kīš+N+Pl+Ela: kīšist
